Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2776.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 23, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-2502, to read: START_STATUTE33-2502. Laws restricting private property rights prohibited This state and a political subdivision of this state may not adopt a law or implement a policy that deliberately or inadvertently infringes or restricts private property rights without due process.END_STATUTE